California, session 20252026, SB587.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17053.90 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17053.90. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2031, there shall be allowed a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, to a taxpayer in an amount equal to qualified tax payments made during the taxable year.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Tax payment” means either of the following:(A) A sales tax reimbursement paid by the taxpayer to a retailer, as reimbursement for a tax imposed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6051) of Part 1, or pursuant to a local ordinance authorized by Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) or Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251).(B) Use taxes paid by the taxpayer pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201) of Part 1, or pursuant to a local ordinance authorized by Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) or Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251).(2) “Qualified tax payment” means a tax payment made to the extent that the purchase, or the storage, use, or other consumption in this state, of tangible personal property would have been exempt from tax pursuant to Section 6377.1 if not for the application of subdivision (d) of that section.(c) Any deduction otherwise allowed under this part for any amount paid or incurred by the taxpayer upon which the credit is based shall be reduced by the amount of the credit allowed under this section. (d) If a credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding eight years, if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.(e) The credit allowed by this section may be claimed only on a timely filed original return of a taxpayer.(f) (1) A credit, or the carryover of a credit pursuant to subdivision (d), shall not be allowed with respect to tangible personal property described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 6377.1. (2) In the case where a taxpayer claims a credit under this section, and the tangible personal property that is subject to the tax giving rise to the credit provided under this section is subsequently moved out of state or is otherwise described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 6377.1 within one year from the date of purchase, the taxpayer shall file an amended return for the taxable year in which the credit was claimed.(g) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may request any information necessary for the administration of this section from the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration. (2) Notwithstanding Section 7056, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may provide information to the Franchise Tax Board, in a form and manner agreed upon between the department and the Franchise Tax Board, necessary for the administration of this section. Any taxpayer information provided by the department to the Franchise Tax Board shall be subject to the provisions of Section 7056.5.(h) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, procedures, or other guidance to carry out the purposes of this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section. (2) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any regulations to prevent improper claims from being filed. (i) (1) On or before May 14, 2026, and annually thereafter, the Department of Finance shall provide to the legislative budget committees an estimate of the amount of revenue that would not be realized if the credits established under this section were allowed for that taxable year.(2) The credits established by this section shall be allowed only for taxable years for which the Legislature appropriates money in the Budget Act for the administration of the credits established by this section. (i)(j) (1) For the purpose of complying with Section 41, as it pertains to the credit allowed by this section and Section 23623, the Legislature finds and declares the following: (A) The specific goal that the credits will achieve is to encourage new and continued investment in California in the areas of manufacturing and research and development.(B) Detailed performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining whether the credits meet that goal are as follows: (i) The total dollar amount of tax credits allowed pursuant to this section and Section 23623.(ii) The number of taxpayers that were allowed a tax credit pursuant to this section.(2) (A) On or before April 1, 2033, the Franchise Tax Board shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, detailing the total dollar amount of tax credits allowed pursuant to this section and Section 23623, and the number of taxpayers allowed a credit.(B) The disclosure requirements of this paragraph shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542.(j)(k) Except for the reporting requirements of subdivision (i), (j), this section shall remain operative only until December 1, 2031, and is repealed as of January 1, 2034.SEC. 2. Section 23623 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:23623. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2031, there shall be allowed a credit against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, to a taxpayer in an amount equal to qualified tax payments made during the taxable year.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Tax payment” means either of the following:(A) A sales tax reimbursement paid by the taxpayer to a retailer, as reimbursement for a tax imposed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6051) of Part 1, or pursuant to a local ordinance authorized by Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) or Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251).(B) Use taxes paid by the taxpayer pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201) of Part 1, or pursuant to a local ordinance authorized by Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) or Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251).(2) “Qualified tax payment” means a tax payment made to the extent that the purchase, or the storage, use, or other consumption in this state, of tangible personal property would have been exempt from tax pursuant to Section 6377.1 if not for the application of subdivision (d) of that section.(c) Any deduction otherwise allowed under this part for any amount paid or incurred by the taxpayer upon which the credit is based shall be reduced by the amount of the credit allowed under this section.(d) If a credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding eight years, if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.(e) The credit allowed by this section may be claimed only on a timely filed original return of a taxpayer.(f) (1) A credit, or the carryover of a credit pursuant to subdivision (d), shall not be allowed with respect to tangible personal property described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 6377.1.(2) In the case where a taxpayer claims a credit under this section, and the tangible personal property that is subject to the tax giving rise to the credit provided under this section is subsequently moved out of state or is otherwise described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 6377.1 within one year from the date of purchase, the taxpayer shall file an amended return for the taxable year in which the credit was claimed.(g) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may request any information necessary for the administration of this section from the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.(2) Notwithstanding Section 7056, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may provide information to the Franchise Tax Board, in a form and manner agreed upon between the department and the Franchise Tax Board, necessary for the administration of this section. Any taxpayer information provided by the department to the Franchise Tax Board shall be subject to the provisions of Section 7056.5.(h) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, procedures, or other guidance to carry out the purposes of this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section. (2) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any regulations to prevent improper claims from being filed. (i) (1) On or before May 14, 2026, and annually thereafter, the Department of Finance shall provide to the legislative budget committees an estimate of the amount of revenue that would not be realized if the credits established under this section were allowed for that taxable year.(2) The credits established by this section shall be allowed only for taxable years for which the Legislature appropriates money in the Budget Act for the administration of the credits established by this section.(i)(j) This section shall remain operative only until December 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 4. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.